sl-SI: Zasnova glasbenih vilic: Nobteženo; Obteženo; Drugo
ja: 音叉の種類: 重りなし; ウェイト; その他
ro-RO: Design diapazon: Neponderat; Ponderat; Altele
sv: Stämgaffelutförande: Oviktad; Viktad; Övrigt
de: Stimmgabeldesign: Ungewichtet; Gewichtet; Sonstiges
nl: Ontwerp stemvork: Ongewogen; Gewogen; Andere
zh-CN: 音叉设计: 未加权; 加权; 其他
tr: Diyapazon tasarımı: Ağırlıksız; Ağırlıklı; Diğer
el: Σχέδιο διαπασών: Αζύγιστο; Σταθμισμένο; Άλλο
hu: Hangvilla kialakítása: Súlyozatlan; Súlyozott; Egyéb
th: การออกแบบส้อมเสียง: ไม่ถ่วงน้ำหนัก; แบบถ่วงน้ำหนัก; อื่นๆ
es: Diseño del diapasón: Sin pesas; Ponderado; Otros
it: Design del diapason: Leggero; Pesata; Altro
cs: Design ladičky: Nevážený; Vážené; Jiné
sk-SK: Dizajn ladičky: Nevážený; Vážený/Weighted; Iné
zh-TW: 音叉設計: 無加重; 加重; 其他
en: Tuning fork design: Unweighted; Weighted; Other
bg-BG: Дизайн на камертон: Непретеглен; Претеглен; Други
lt-LT: Kamertono dizainas: Nesvertinis; Svertinis; Kita
pt-PT: Design de diapasão: Não ponderado; Pesadas; Outro
nb: Stemmegaffeldesign: Uvektet; Vektet; Annet
fr: Conception du diapason: Non pondérées; Lestée; Autre
ru: Конструкция камертона: Невзвешенный; Взвешенная; Другой
fi: Virityshaarukan muotoilu: Painottamaton; Painotettu; Muu
da: Stemmegaffeldesign: Uvægtet; Vægtet; Andet
vi: Thiết kế âm thoa: Không có trọng số; Nặng; Khác
ko: 소리굽쇠 디자인: 비가중; 가중; 기타
pl: Projekt kamertonu: Nieważony; Ważony; Inne
pt-BR: Formato do diapasão: Não ponderado; Ponderado; Outro
hr-HR: Dizajn vilice za ugađanje: Neponderirana; Ponderirana; Ostalo